Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF714.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [609.8915] DIGITAL PICTURE AND RECORDING MISREPRESENTATION. new text end new text begin (a) A person is guilty of digital picture and recording misrepresentation if the person intentionally alters a digital picture or recording of another person or owned by another person: new text end new text begin (1) without obtaining the subject person's or owner's consent; new text end new text begin (2) with the intent to cause a recipient of the altered digital picture or recording to reasonably believe that the subject person or owner authorized or transmitted the digital picture or recording by a means including, at a minimum, email, text message, or posting on the Internet; and new text end new text begin (3) with the intent to harm, defraud, or maliciously misrepresent: new text end new text begin (i) the subject person or owner; or new text end new text begin (ii) an event presented, attended, or both, by the subject person or owner, or personal or real property owned by the subject person or owner. new text end new text begin (b) A person who violates paragraph (a) is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end